New York, session 2025-2026, S10528.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 7 of section 64-a of the alcoholic beverage 2 control law is amended by adding a new paragraph (c-7) to read as 3 follows: 4 (c-7) Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subdivi- 5 sion, the authority may issue a retail license for on-premises consump- 6 tion for a premises which shall be located within two hundred feet of a 7 building occupied exclusively as a school, church, synagogue, or other 8 place of worship, provided such premises constitutes a premises for the 9 sale of food or beverages at retail for consumption on the premises 10 located wholly within the boundaries of the county of Greene, bounded 11 and described as follows: 12 ALL that piece or parcel of land, situated in the Village of Catskill, 13 County of Greene and State of New York, described as follows: 14 BEGINNING at the southeast corner of that parcel of land described as 15 "Parcel 1" in deed recorded in Liber 613 of Deeds at Page 246, being on 16 the north line of Church Street, thence N 89°02'07" W, 58.68 feet along 17 the north line of said Church Street to a line 20.00 feet east from, 18 when measured at right angles to, and parallel with the centerline of 19 existing southbound Water Street; 20 THENCE N 03°03'19" W, 45.31 feet parallel with the centerline of said 21 Water Street to the northwest corner of that parcel of land described as 22 "Parcel 2" in said Liber 613 of Deeds at Page 246; 23 THENCE N 89°06'33" E, 62.32 feet along the north line of said "Parcel 24 2" and along the north line of said "Parcel 1" to the northeast corner 25 of said "Parcel 1"; 26 THENCE S 01°29'38" W, 47.22 feet along the east line of said "Parcel 27 1" to the point of the BEGINNING. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15221-03-6 S. 10528 2 1 Being the same premises conveyed by Deed dated November 18, 2005, to 2 Samuel D. Aldi from Dominic Joseph Cornelius, and recorded in the Greene 3 County Clerk's Office on December 8, 2005, in Liber 1197 of Deeds at 4 Page 193. 5 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.